Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-1221
Person, defined.

Person means an individual, a corporation, a limited liability company, a partnership, an association, a trust, or any other entity or organization, including an authority.

Laws 2019, LB184, § 21.